Washington statutes.
RCW 1.60.060

Appearance of medal and certificate.

(1) The decoration of the state medal of valor shall be of .999 pure silver and shall consist of the seal of the state of Washington, surrounded by a raised laurel wreath and suspended from a silver bar device inscribed "For Valor" which is suspended from a ring attached by a dark green ribbon, bordered by silver. The reverse of the decoration within the raised laurel wreath shall be inscribed with the recipient's name and the words: "For exceptionally valorous service, given in the act of saving the life of another."

(2) The certificate accompanying the medal will prominently display: (a) The title, "Washington State Medal of Valor"; (b) the recipient's name; and (c) the phrase, "For exceptionally valorous service, given in the act of saving the life of another." A seven-line citation will also be included on the certificate.

[ 2000 c 224 s 6.]